Massachusetts, session 194th, S1700.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following new subsection after subsection (gg):-
(hh) In order to ensure the safety of students, faculty and staff on college campuses, the
council shall have the power to require the issuance of firearms and any other safety equipment it
deems necessary to campus police officers employed by the commonwealth and working on the
campuses of state colleges, community colleges and universities. The decision to issue firearms
and other safety equipment shall be binding regardless of any past or future vote to the contrary
by a board of trustees.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 15A is further amended in Section 22 by inserting the following in
the first sentence after the word authority:- "except in matters related to public safety on campus
pursuant to subsection (hh) in Section 9 of this chapter".
of 2